Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.410

Commission—Information to legislature.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

In addition to the authority provided in RCW 42.52.804, the *commission, its members, or staff as directed by the *commission, may communicate, present information requested, volunteer information, testify before legislative committees, and educate the legislature, as the *commission may from time to time see fit.

[2013 c 81 s 6.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to "nursing care quality assurance commission" was changed to "board of nursing" by 2023 c 123.

Effective date—2013 c 81: See note following RCW 18.25.0167.